Vermont, session 2025-2026, H592.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 13 V.S.A. § 5232 is amended to read:
§ 5232. PARTICULAR PROCEEDINGS
Counsel shall be assigned under section 5231 of this title to represent needy
persons in any of the following:
(1) extradition proceedings;
VT LEG #385622 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.592
2026 Page 2 of 10
(2) habeas corpus and other proceedings wherein in which the person is
confined in a penal or mental institution in this state State and seeks release
therefrom from such institution; or
(3) proceedings arising out of a petition brought in a juvenile court when
the court deems the interests of justice require representation of either the child
or his or her the child’s parents or guardian, or both, including any subsequent
proceedings arising from an order therein in those proceedings; or
(4) forfeiture proceedings pursuant to 6 V.S.A. § 3315 (livestock and
poultry products); 7 V.S.A. §§ 567 and 574 (alcoholic beverages, alcohol, and
related property); 10 V.S.A. §§ 4505 and 4511 (property associated with big
game violations); 18 V.S.A. chapter 84, subchapter 2 (regulated drugs and
related property); and 23 V.S.A. § 1213c (motor vehicles).
Sec. 2. 6 V.S.A. § 3315 is amended to read:
§ 3315. FORFEITURE
* * *
(b)(1) Law enforcement departments and agencies or other State
departments and agencies that have custody of any property subject to
forfeiture under this section, or that dispose of such property, shall keep and
maintain full and complete records, including the following:
(A) from whom the property was received;
(B) a description of the property;
VT LEG #385622 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.592
2026 Page 3 of 10
(C) the value of the property;
(D) under what authority the property was held or received or
disposed of;
(E) to whom the property was delivered; and
(F) the date and manner of destruction or disposition of the property.
(2) The records shall be submitted to the Superior Court and shall be
open to inspection by all federal and State departments and agencies charged
with regulation and enforcement of livestock and poultry products. Persons
making final disposition or destruction of the property under court order shall
report, under oath, to the court the exact circumstances of that disposition or
destruction, and a copy of that report shall be maintained by the Superior
Court.
(c) The provisions of this section shall in no way impair authority for
condemnation or seizure conferred by other provisions of this chapter or other
laws.
Sec. 3. 7 V.S.A. § 604 is added to read:
§ 604. RECORDS OF FORFEITED PROPERTY
(a) Law enforcement departments and agencies or other State departments
and agencies that have custody of any property subject to forfeiture under
section 567 or 574 of this title, or that dispose of such property, shall keep and
maintain full and complete records, including the following:
VT LEG #385622 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.592
2026 Page 4 of 10
(1) from whom the property was received;
(2) a description of the property;
(3) the value of the property;
(4) if the property is deposited in an interest-bearing account, the
location of the account and the amount of interest;
(5) under what authority the property was held or received or disposed
of;
(6) to whom the property was delivered; and
(7) the date and manner of destruction or disposition of the property.
(b) The records shall be submitted to the Superior Court and shall be open
to inspection by all federal and State departments and agencies charged with
regulation and enforcement of alcoholic beverages. Persons making final
disposition or destruction of the property under court order shall report, under
oath, to the court the exact circumstances of that disposition or destruction, and
a copy of that report shall be maintained by the Superior Court.
Sec. 4. 10 V.S.A. chapter 109, subchapter 1 is amended to read:
Subchapter 1. General Provisions
* * *
§ 4520a. NOTICE AND HEARING REQUIREMENTS
(a) The Commissioner shall use the following procedures in assessing the
penalty under section 4520 of this title: the Attorney General or an alleged
VT LEG #385622 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.592
2026 Page 5 of 10
violator shall be given an opportunity for a hearing after reasonable notice;,
and the notice shall be served by personal service or by certified mail, return
receipt requested. The notice shall include:
(1) a statement of the legal authority and jurisdiction under which the
hearing is to be held;
(2) a statement of the matter at issue, including reference to the
particular statute allegedly violated and a factual description of the alleged
violation;
(3) the amount of the proposed administrative penalty; and
(4) a warning that the decision shall become final and the penalty
imposed if no hearing is requested within 15 days of following receipt of the
notice. The notice shall specify the requirements which that shall be met in
order to avoid being deemed to have waived the right to a hearing or the
manner of payment if the person elects to pay the penalty and waive a hearing;
and
(5) the right to the advice and assistance of private counsel or the public
defender.
(b) Any person who receives notification pursuant to this section shall be
deemed to have waived the right to a hearing unless, within 15 days of
following the receipt of the notice, the person requests a hearing in writing. If
the person waives the right to a hearing, the Commissioner shall issue a final
VT LEG #385622 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.592
2026 Page 6 of 10
order finding the person in default and imposing the penalty. A copy of the
final default order shall be sent to the violator by certified mail, return receipt
requested.
(c) When an alleged violator requests a hearing in a timely fashion, the
Commissioner shall hold the hearing pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25.
* * *
§ 4523. RECORDS OF FORFEITED PROPERTY
(a) Law enforcement departments and agencies or other State departments
and agencies that have custody of any property subject to forfeiture under
section 4505 or 4511 of this title, or that dispose of such property, shall keep
and maintain full and complete records, including the following:
(1) from whom the property was received;
(2) a description of the property;
(3) the value of the property;
(4) if the property is deposited in an interest-bearing account, the
location of the account and the amount of interest;
(5) under what authority the property was held or received or disposed
of;
(6) to whom the property was delivered; and
(7) the date and manner of destruction or disposition of the property.
VT LEG #385622 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.592
2026 Page 7 of 10
(b) The records shall be submitted to the Commissioner and shall be open
to inspection by all federal and State departments and agencies charged with
regulation and enforcement of alcoholic beverages. Persons making final
disposition or destruction of the property under court order shall report, under
oath, to the court the exact circumstances of that disposition or destruction, and
a copy of that report shall be maintained by the Commissioner.
Sec. 5. 18 V.S.A. § 4243 is amended to read:
§ 4243. JUDICIAL FORFEITURE PROCEDURE
* * *
(d) Notice. Within 60 days from when the seizure occurs, the State shall
notify any owners, possessors, and lienholders of the property of the action, if
known or readily ascertainable. The notice shall include a statement that the
recipient has the right to the advice and assistance of private counsel or the
public defender pursuant to 13 V.S.A. § 5232(4). Upon motion by the State, a
court may extend the time period for sending notice for a period not to exceed
90 days for good cause shown.
(e) Return of property. If notice is not sent in accordance with subsection
(d) of this section, and no time extension is granted or the extension period has
expired, the law enforcement agency shall return the property to the person
from whom the property was seized. An agency’s return of property due to
lack of proper notice does not restrict the agency’s authority to commence a
VT LEG #385622 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.592
2026 Page 8 of 10
forfeiture proceeding at a later time. Nothing in this subsection shall require
the agency to return contraband, evidence, or other property that the person
from whom the property was seized is not entitled to lawfully possess.
* * *
Sec. 6. 23 V.S.A. § 1213c is amended to read:
§ 1213c. IMMOBILIZATION AND FORFEITURE PROCEEDINGS
* * *
(b) Content of notice. The notice shall contain the following:
(1) a description of the motor vehicle, including vehicle identification
number, make, model, and year;
(2) the name of the registered owner or owners, lienholder, and any
other person appearing to be an innocent owner or operator as described in
subsection (g) of this section;
(3) the date, time, and place of the hearing; and
(4) a statement that any person who is an owner, an innocent owner or
operator, or who holds a security interest in or claims any interest in the motor
vehicle may appear and be heard at the hearing to protect the person’s interest
in the motor vehicle; and
(5) the right to the advice and assistance of private counsel or the public
defender pursuant to 13 V.S.A. § 5232(4).
* * *
VT LEG #385622 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.592
2026 Page 9 of 10
(p) Records.
(1) Law enforcement departments and agencies or other State
departments and agencies that have custody of any property subject to
forfeiture under this section, or that dispose of such property, shall keep and
maintain full and complete records, including the following:
(A) from whom the property was received;
(B) a description of the property;
(C) the value of the property;
(D) if the property is deposited in an interest-bearing account, the
location of the account and the amount of interest;
(E) under what authority the property was held or received or
disposed of;
(F) to whom the property was delivered; and
(G) the date and manner of destruction or disposition of the property.
(2) The records shall be submitted to the Superior Court and shall be
open to inspection by all federal and State departments and agencies charged
with regulation and enforcement of alcoholic beverages. Persons making final
disposition or destruction of the property under court order shall report, under
oath, to the court the exact circumstances of that disposition or destruction, and
a copy of that report shall be maintained by the Superior Court.
VT LEG #385622 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.592
2026 Page 10 of 10
Sec. 7. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385622 v.1